Hawaii statutes.
[PART
VI.] BIOSECURITY PROGRAM

Note

Invasive species management requirements, including
interisland and export database for agricultural commodities. L 2016, c 243,
§§3, 6.

§150A-57 Annual report. The
department shall submit an annual report on the biosecurity program to the
legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular
session of the legislature. The report shall include:

(1) The schedule required under section 150A-56;

(2) The status of each activity required by Act 243,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2016, including for each activity:

(A) All expenditures;

(B) Descriptions of and the purposes of any
activity-related travel;

(C) Workforce allocation; and

(D) Measure of effectiveness;

(3) Summary of interisland inspections and export
inspection activities;

(4) Projections by year of future expenditures and
future acreage to be under pest management by crop; and

(5) Activities yet to be completed, and, if
applicable, an explanation why they were not completed. [L 2008, c 236, pt of
§2; am L 2016, c 243, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next